Maine, session 132, LD1851.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 8 MRSA §1036, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2015, c. 493, §4, is further
amended to read:
2. Distribution of net slot machine income from casino with commercial track. A
slot machine operator licensed under section 1011, subsection 2 or a casino operator that is
a commercial track that was licensed to operate slot machines under section 1011,
subsection 2 on January 1, 2011 shall collect and distribute 39% 46% of the net slot
machine income from slot machines operated by the slot machine operator to the board for
distribution by the board as follows:
A. Three percent of the net slot machine income must be deposited to the General
Fund for administrative expenses of the board in accordance with rules adopted by the
board, except that of the amount calculated pursuant to this paragraph, the following
amounts must be transferred annually to the Gambling Addiction Prevention and
Treatment Fund established by Title 5, section 20006‑B:
(1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2011, $50,000;
(2) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2012, $50,000; and
(3) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2013 and for each fiscal year thereafter,
$100,000;
B. Ten percent of the net slot machine income must be forwarded by the board to the
Treasurer of State, who shall credit the money to the fund established in section 298 to
supplement harness racing purses;
C. Three percent of the net slot machine income must be credited by the board to the
Sire Stakes Fund created in section 281;
D. Three percent of the net slot machine income must be forwarded by the board to
the Treasurer of State, who shall credit the money to the Agricultural Fair Support Fund
established in Title 7, section 91;
E. Ten percent of the net slot machine income must be forwarded by the board to the
State Controller and except as otherwise provided in this paragraph credited to the Fund
for a Healthy Maine established by Title 22, section 1511 and segregated into a separate
account under Title 22, section 1511, subsection 11, with the use of funds in the account
restricted to the purposes described in Title 22, section 1511, subsection 6, paragraph
E. For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2010, June 30, 2011 and June 30, 2012, the
amount credited annually by the State Controller to the Fund for a Healthy Maine under
this paragraph may not exceed $4,500,000 annually and any funds in excess of
$4,500,000 annually during these fiscal years must be credited as General Fund
undedicated revenue, and, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2013, the amount credited
by the State Controller to the Fund for a Healthy Maine under this paragraph is $0;
F. Two percent of the net slot machine income must be forwarded by the board to the
University of Maine System Scholarship Fund created in Title 20‑A, section 10909 and
to the Board of Trustees of the Maine Maritime Academy to be applied by the board
of trustees to fund its scholarship program. The slot machine income under this
paragraph must be distributed as follows:
Page 1 - 132LR2166(01)

(1) The University of Maine System share is the total amount of the distribution
multiplied by the ratio of enrolled students in the system to the total number of
enrolled students both in the system and at the Maine Maritime Academy; and
(2) The Maine Maritime Academy share is the total amount of the distribution
multiplied by the ratio of enrolled students at the academy to the total number of
enrolled students both in the system and at the academy;
G. One percent of the net slot machine income must be forwarded by the board to the
board of trustees of the Maine Community College System to be applied by the board
of trustees to fund its scholarships program under Title 20‑A, section 12716, subsection
1;
H. Four percent of the net slot machine income must be forwarded by the board to the
Treasurer of State, who shall credit the money to the Fund to Encourage Racing at
Maine's Commercial Tracks, established in section 299;
I. Two percent of the net slot machine income must be forwarded by the board to the
Treasurer of State, who shall credit the money to the Fund to Stabilize Off-track Betting
Facilities established by section 300, as long as a facility has conducted off-track
wagering operations for a minimum of 250 days during the preceding 12-month period
in which the first payment to the fund is required. After 48 months of receiving an
allocation of the net slot machine income from a licensed operator, the percent of net
slot machine income forwarded to the Fund to Stabilize Off-track Betting Facilities is
reduced to 1% with the remaining 1% to be forwarded to the State in accordance with
subsection 1; and
J. One percent of the net slot machine income must be forwarded directly to the
municipality in which the slot machines are located.; and
K. Seven percent of the net slot machine income must be forwarded by the board to
the Treasurer of State, who shall distribute the funds to the tribal governments of the
Houlton Band of Maliseet Indians and the Mi'kmaq Nation.